Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB60.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4(a)(3.1)(ii) of the act of September 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, No.699), known as the Pharmacy Act, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 4(A)(3.1)(I) AND (II) OF THE ACT OF SEPTEMBER 27, 1961 (P.L.1700, NO.699), KNOWN AS THE PHARMACY ACT, ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 4. Permit to Conduct a Pharmacy.--(a) The State Board of Pharmacy shall issue a permit to any person to conduct a pharmacy who has filed an application therefor, subscribed by the applicant under oath or affirmation, and containing such <--<--123456789101112131415161718 information as the board may require, and whose proposed pharmacy complies with all requirements of this act, including the following:* * *(3.1) Adheres to the following requirements for transferring prescriptions between pharmacies in Pennsylvania:* * *[(I) THE PRESCRIPTION IS FOR A DRUG WHICH IS LAWFULLY REFILLABLE.](ii) [The drug is not a Schedule II controlled substance, except for a drug that may be transfered between pharmacies under Federal law or regulation.] THE DRUG IS NOT EXCLUDED FROM BEING TRANSFERRED BETWEEN PHARMACIES BY FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION, INCLUDING 21 CFR 1306.08 (RELATING TO ELECTRONIC PRESCRIPTIONS).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0060PN0474 - 2 - <--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617